Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-2301
Act, how cited; legislative findings.

(1) Sections 39-2301 to 39-2311 shall be known and may be cited as the County Highway and City Street Superintendents Act.

(2) The Legislature finds that in order to safeguard life, health, and property, and in order to further professional management of county road and municipal street programs, persons practicing or offering to practice street or highway superintending in this state are encouraged to become licensed as provided in the act.

Laws 1969, c. 144, § 1, p. 665;

Laws 2003, LB 500, § 1.